ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 가전 제품 부대용품 > 세탁용 가전 부대용품 > 스팀 다리미 부대용품: 코드 케이스; 의류 스팀기 브러시; 스팀 다리미 카트; 의류 스팀기 패브릭 클립; 의류 스팀기 호스; 의류 스팀기 물탱크; 보관용 파우치
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家电配件 > 洗衣机配件 > 蒸汽挂烫机配件: 线夹; 挂烫机刷头; 可移动挂烫机; 挂烫机衣物夹; 挂烫机软管; 挂烫机水箱; 储物袋
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Pribor za kućanske aparate > Pribor za kućanske aparate za rublje > Pribor za uređaje za parno glačanje: Držači za kabele; Četke za uređaje za parno glačanje; Kolica za uređaje za parno glačanje; Kopče za tkaninu za uređaje za parno glačanje; Crijeva za uređaje za parno glačanje; Spremnici za vodu za uređaje za parno glačanje; Vrećice za pohranu
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Аксесоари за домакински уреди > Аксесоари за перални уреди > Аксесоари за уреди за вертикално гладене: Държачи за кабели; Уреди с пара за гладене на дрехи; Уреди за вертикално гладене на колела; Щипки за платове за уреди с пара за гладене на дрехи; Маркучи за уреди за вертикално гладене; Резервоари за вода за уреди с пара за гладене на дрехи; Торбички за съхранение
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 家用電器配件 > 烘乾機/洗衣機/脫水機配件 > 蒸氣熨斗配件: 線夾; 蒸氣熨斗刷頭; 蒸氣掛燙機; 蒸氣掛燙機衣夾; 蒸氣熨斗軟管; 蒸氣掛燙機水箱; 收納隨身包
ru: Дом и сад > Аксессуары для бытовой техники > Аксессуары для техники для стирки, сушки и глажки > Аксессуары для отпаривателей для одежды: Держатели для шнура; Щетки для отпаривателей одежды; Тележки для отпаривателей для одежды; Прищепки для ткани отпаривателя для одежды; Шланги для отпаривателей одежды; Резервуары для воды в отпаривателях для одежды; Мешочки для хранения
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsapparater – tilbehør > Vasketøj – tilbehør > Tøjdamper – tilbehør: Ledningsholdere; Børster til tøjdampere; Tøjdampervogne; Klemmer til tekstildampere; Slanger til tøjdampere; Vandtanke til tekstildampere; Opbevaringsposer
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Buitinės technikos priedai > Skalbimo prietaisų priedai > Garinių lygintuvų priedai: Laido laikikliai; Garinių lygintuvų šepetėliai; Garinių lygintuvų vežimėliai; Garinių lygintuvų audinių spaustukai; Garinių lygintuvų žarnos; Garinių lygintuvų vandens bakai; Laikymo maišeliai
vi: Nhà và vườn > Thiết bị điện gia dụng > Phụ kiện thiết bị giặt là > Phụ kiện bàn là hơi: Giá đỡ dây; Bàn Chải Máy Ủi Quần Áo; Bàn là hơi kiểu xe đẩy; Kẹp Vải Máy Ủi Quần Áo; Ống Dẫn Máy Ủi Quần Áo; Bình Nước Máy Ủi Quần Áo; Túi trữ
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartásigép-kiegészítők > Mosógép-kiegészítők > Ruhagőzölő-kiegészítők: Vezetéktartók; Ruhagőzölő kefék; Ruhagőzölő-kocsik; Ruhagőzölő szövetcsipeszek; Ruhagőzölő tömlők; Ruhagőzölő víztartályok; Tárolótasakok
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsgeräte-Zubehör > Wasch-Zubehör > Zubehör für Dampfmaschinen: Kabelhalter; Dampfglätterbürsten; Wagen für Dampfmaschinen; Stoffclips für Dampfglätter; Schläuche für Dampfglätter; Wassertanks für Dampfglätter; Aufbewahrungstaschen
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Aleti Aksesuarları > Çamaşırhane Makinesi Aksesuarları > Buharlı Elbise Temizleyici Aksesuarları: Kordon Tutucular; Giysi Buhar Makinesi Fırçaları; Buharlı Elbise Temizleyici Arabaları; Giysi Buhar Makinesi Kumaş Klipsleri; Giysi Buhar Makinesi Hortumları; Giysi Buhar Makinesi Su Hazneleri; Saklama Torbaları
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Acessórios de eletrodomésticos > Acessórios de equipamento para a roupa > Acessórios de dispositivo de vapor para a roupa: Suportes para cabos; Escovas para vaporizador de roupa; Carrinhos para dispositivos de aplicação de vapor para a roupa; Clipes de tecido para vaporizador de roupa; Mangueiras para vaporizador de roupa; Depósitos de água para vaporizador de roupa; Bolsas de armazenamento
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Dodatki za gospodinjske aparate > Dodatki za pralne stroje > Dodatki za parne osvežilce tkanin: Nosilci za kable; Krtače za parne likalnike; Vozički za parne osvežilce tkanin; Sponke za blago s parnim likalnikom za oblačila; Cevi za parne likalnike; Rezervoarji za vodo za parne likalnike za oblačila; Vrečke za shranjevanje
cs: Dům a zahrada > Domácí spotřebiče – příslušenství > Prádelní zařízení – příslušenství > Parní žehličky – příslušenství: Držáky přívodního kabelu; Kartáče pro parní žehličky; Parní žehličky – vozíky; Příchytky na látku k napařovačům oděvů; Hadice parních žehliček; Nádržky na vodu k napařovačům oděvů; Skladovací kapsy
it: Casa e giardino > Accessori elettrodomestici > Accessori lavatrici e asciugatrici > Accessori ferri da stiro a vapore: Portacavi; Spazzole per stiratrici a vapore; Carrelli per vaporizzazione indumenti; Clip per tessuti per vaporizzatori per indumenti; Tubi per stiratrici a vapore; Serbatoi d'acqua per vaporizzatori per indumenti; Borsoni portaoggetti
fr: Maison et jardin > Accessoires pour appareils électroménagers > Accessoires pour appareils de blanchisserie > Accessoires pour défroisseurs à vapeur: Supports de câbles; Brosses pour défroisseur à vapeur; Chariots de défroisseur à vapeur; Pinces à tissu pour défroisseur; Tuyaux pour défroisseur à vapeur; Réservoirs d'eau pour défroisseur; Pochettes de rangement
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 家電関連用品 > ランドリー家電関連用品 > ガーメントスチーマー関連用品: コードホルダー; ガーメントスチーマーブラシ; ガーメントスチーマーカート; ガーメントスチーマー用ファブリッククリップ; ガーメントスチーマーホース; ガーメントスチーマー用給水タンク; 収納ポーチ
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Αξεσουάρ οικιακών συσκευών > Αξεσουάρ συσκευών πλυντηρίου > Αξεσουάρ ατμοκαθαριστών ρούχων: Βάσεις καλωδίων; Βούρτσες ατμοκαθαριστών ρούχων; Καρότσια ατμοκαθαριστών ρούχων; Κλιπ υφάσματος για ατμοκαθαριστές ρούχων; Σωλήνες ατμοκαθαριστών ρούχων; Δοχεία νερού ατμοκαθαριστών ρούχων; Θήκες αποθήκευσης
en: Home & Garden > Household Appliance Accessories > Laundry Appliance Accessories > Garment Steamer Accessories: Cord Holders; Garment Steamer Brushes; Garment Steamer Carts; Garment Steamer Fabric Clips; Garment Steamer Hoses; Garment Steamer Water Tanks; Storage Pouches
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Acessórios para eletrodomésticos > Acessórios para aparelhos de lavanderia > Acessórios para vaporizador de roupas: Porta-cabos; Escovas para vaporizadores de roupas; Carrinho vaporizador de roupas; Presilhas de tecido para vaporizadores de roupas; Mangueiras para vaporizadores de roupas; Tanques de água para vaporizadores de roupas; Bolsas de armazenamento
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Accesorii pentru electrocasnice > Accesorii pentru electrocasnice pentru rufe > Accesorii pentru aparate de călcat cu aburi: Suporturi pentru cabluri; Perii pentru aparate de călcat cu abur; Cărucioare pentru aparate de călcat cu aburi; Cleme pentru țesături pentru aparat de călcat cu aburi; Furtunuri pentru aparate de călcat cu abur; Rezervoare de apă pentru aparat de călcat cu aburi; Pungi de depozitare
sv: Hem och trädgård > Tillbehör till hushållsapparater > Tillbehör till maskiner för tvätt och strykning > Tillbehör för ångning av kläder: Kabelhållare; Borstar för apparater för ångning av kläder; Vagnar till apparater för ångning av kläder; Tygklämmor för ångtvättar; Slangar för apparater för ångning av kläder; Vattentankar för ångtvättar; Förvaringspåsar
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Príslušenstvo k domácim spotrebičom > Príslušenstvo k vybaveniu práčovne > Príslušenstvo k naparovačom odevov: Držiaky šnúr; Kefy k naparovačom odevov; Naparovače odevov na kolieskach; Klipy na látky do naparovača odevov; Hadice k naparovačom odevov; Nádrže na vodu do naparovačov odevov; Skladovacie vrecká
pl: Dom i ogród > Akcesoria do sprzętu AGD > Akcesoria do prania > Akcesoria do żelazek parowych: Uchwyty na przewody; Szczotki do parownic do ubrań; Parownice do ubrań; Klipsy do parownic do ubrań; Węże do parownic do ubrań; Zbiorniki na wodę do parownic do ubrań; Woreczki do przechowywania
nl: Huis en tuin > Accessoires voor huishoudelijke apparaten > Wasmachine-accessoires > Accessoires voor kledingstomers: Houders voor snoeren; Stoomborstels; Karren voor kledingstomers; Stoffenclips voor kledingstomers; Slangen voor kledingstomers; Watertanks voor kledingstomers; Opslagzakjes
nb: Hjem og hage > Tilbehør til husholdningsapparater > Tilbehør til vaskeapparater > Tilbehør til dampapparater: Ledningsholdere; Børster til tøydampere; Vogner for klesdampere; Klesdamper-stoffklips; Slanger til tøydampere; Vanntanker for klesdampere; Oppbevaringsposer
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์เครื่องใช้ในบ้าน > อุปกรณ์เครื่องซักผ้า > อุปกรณ์เครื่องรีดไอน้ำ: ที่เก็บสายไฟ; แปรงสำหรับเครื่องรีดผ้าไอน้ำ; รถเข็นเครื่องรีดไอน้ำ; คลิปหนีบผ้าสำหรับเครื่องรีดผ้าไอน้ำ; สายยางสำหรับเครื่องรีดผ้าไอน้ำ; ถังเก็บน้ำสำหรับเครื่องรีดผ้าไอน้ำ; ถุงเก็บของ
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kodinkoneiden lisätarvikkeet > Pyykinpesukoneiden lisätarvikkeet > Höyrysilitysraudan lisätarvikkeet: Johtotelineet; Höyrysilitysraudan harjat; Höyrysilitysraudan kärryt; Höyrysilitysrautojen kangasklipsit; Höyrysilitysraudan letkut; Höyrysilitysrautojen vesisäiliöt; Säilytyspussit
es: Casa y jardín > Accesorios para electrodomésticos > Accesorios para electrodomésticos de lavandería > Accesorios de vaporizadores para ropa: Soportes para cables; Cepillos para vaporizadores de prendas; Carros vaporizadores para ropa; Pinzas para tela para vaporizadores de prendas; Mangueras para vaporizadores de prendas; Tanques de agua para vaporizadores de prendas; Bolsas de almacenamiento